Massachusetts, session 194th, H3378.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 4C of chapter 7D of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out the second sentence and inserting in place thereof the
following 4 sentences:- The chief digital officer shall improve the web services for executive
offices and agencies. The chief digital officer will require plain and simple language consistent
with the average reading comprehension level of residents of the commonwealth as determined
by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education for web services. The web services
will include information on common issues faced by the public. The chief digital officer will
provide analog alternatives for the web services information written in plain and simple language
consistent with the average reading comprehension level of residents of the commonwealth as
determined by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education.
of 1